District of Columbia statutes.
16-3737

Retention of property by marshal; sufficiency of undertaking, quashing writ, and return of property

Repealed.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 564, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(o)(1)
1981 Ed., §§ 16-3731 to 16-3740.